Utah statutes.
26-6-20.   Serological testing of pregnant or recently delivered women.
(1) Every licensed physician and surgeon attending a pregnant or recently
delivered woman for conditions relating to her pregnancy shall take or cause
to be taken a sample of blood of the woman at the time of first examination or
within ten days thereafter. The blood sample shall be submitted to an approved
laboratory for a standard serological test for syphilis. The provisions of
this section shall not apply to any female who objects thereto on the grounds
that she is a bona fide member of a specified, well recognized religious
organization whose teachings are contrary to the tests.
(2)  Every other person attending a pregnant or recently delivered woman, who
is not permitted by law to take blood samples, shall within ten days from the
time of first attendance cause a sample of blood to be taken by a licensed
physician. The blood sample shall be submitted to an approved laboratory for a
standard serological test for syphilis.
(3)  An approved laboratory is a laboratory approved by the department
according to its rules governing the approval of laboratories for the purpose
of this title.  In submitting the sample to the laboratory the physician shall
designate whether it is a prenatal test or a test following recent delivery.
(4)  For the purpose of this chapter, a "standard serological test" means a
test for syphilis approved by the department and made at an approved
laboratory.
(5) The laboratory shall transmit a detailed report of the standard
serological test, showing the result thereof to the physician.
